Resources/ta_IN.aff
# A Tamil .aff file created for use with Hunspell - By இரா. அசோகன் R.Asokan, Thamizha https://github.com/thamizha

SET UTF-8
TRY ்ுதமனகறடபரநலிஎாளஒவஇஙணேசவயேோஅூழொீஙஞஉஆஸஷஜஏஊஓஈஹௌஐஃஔ

# ordinal numbers (1st, 2nd, 3th, 11th) and decads (0s, 10s, 1990s)
COMPOUNDMIN 1
# compound rules:
# 1. [0-9]*1[0-9]th (10th, 11th, 12th, 56714th, etc.)
# 2. [0-9]*[02-9](1st|2nd|3rd|[4-9]th) (21st, 22nd, 123rd, 1234th, etc.)
COMPOUNDRULE 1
COMPOUNDRULE n*p
WORDCHARS 0123456789'

REP 46
REP	ன்ர ன்ற
REP ன்ட ண்ட
REP ன்ட் ண்ட்
REP ன்டு ண்டு
REP ரை றை
REP ரம் றம்
REP றம் ரம்
REP றை ரை
REP ன் ண்
REP ள் ல்
REP ல் ள்
REP ள ல
REP ல ள
REP ன ண
REP ண ன
REP ண் ன்
REP கோ கொ
REP கொ கோ
REP தெ தே
REP தே தெ
REP தொ தோ
REP தோ தொ
REP கெ கே
REP கே கெ
REP மெ மே
REP மே மெ
REP மொ மோ
REP மோ மொ
REP ழ்ல ழில்
REP ழ்லே ழில்
REP ழ்ஷ் ங்கிலம்
REP ழிஷ் ங்கிலம்
REP தமிழ தமிழை
REP மிழ்வி மிழி
REP தமில் தமிழ்
REP ட்ல ட்டில்
REP டமி தமி
REP தெமி தமி
REP டெமி தமி
REP ர்ல ரில்
REP க்னி கினி
REP ங்கரு ங்கிரு
REP ங்க ங்கே
REP வனை வணை
REP ைல ையில்
REP த்ர த்திர

PFX z Y 36
PFX z   அ அவ்வ         அ
PFX z   ஆ அவ்வா         ஆ
PFX z   இ அவ்வி         இ
PFX z   ஈ அவ்வீ         ஈ
PFX z   உ அவ்வு         உ
PFX z   ஊ அவ்வூ         ஊ
PFX z   எ அவ்வெ         எ
PFX z   ஏ அவ்வே         ஏ
PFX z   ஐ அவ்வை         ஐ
PFX z   ஒ அவ்வொ         ஒ
PFX z   ஓ அவ்வோ         ஓ
PFX z   0 அக்         க
PFX z   0 அச்         ச
PFX z   0 அத்         த
PFX z   0 அப்         ப
PFX z   0 அந்         ந
PFX z   0 அம்         ம
PFX z   0 அவ்         வ
PFX z   அ     இவ்வ         அ
PFX z   ஆ     இவ்வா         ஆ
PFX z   இ     இவ்வி         இ
PFX z   ஈ     இவ்வீ         ஈ
PFX z   உ     இவ்வு         உ
PFX z   ஊ     இவ்வூ         ஊ
PFX z   எ     இவ்வெ         எ
PFX z   ஏ     இவ்வே         ஏ
PFX z   ஐ     இவ்வை         ஐ
PFX z   ஒ     இவ்வொ         ஒ
PFX z   ஓ     இவ்வோ         ஓ
PFX z   0     இக்         க
PFX z   0     இச்         ச
PFX z   0     இத்         த
PFX z   0     இப்         ப
PFX z   0     இந்         ந
PFX z   0     இம்         ம
PFX z   0     இவ்         வ

# பின்னிடைச்சொற்கள் Postpositions/Clitics
# பை, பசு, பூ; ஆள், நாள்
SFX x Y 13
SFX x    0    வா    [ூு]
SFX x    0    யா    ை
SFX x    ்     ா      ்
SFX x    0    வே    [ூு]
SFX x    0    யே     ை
SFX x    ்     ே      ்
SFX x    0    வோ    [ூு]
SFX x    0    யோ     ை
SFX x    ்     ோ      ்
SFX x    0     தான்     .
SFX x    0     தானா     .
SFX x    0     தானே     .
SFX x    0     தானோ     .

# Other than பை, பசு, பூ; ஆள், நாள்
SFX y Y 51
SFX y    0     யா    [செ]ய்
SFX y    ்     ா     [தா]ய்
SFX y    0    ணா     ண்
SFX y    ்     ா      [^பொமு]ன்
SFX y    0    னா      [பொமு]ன்
SFX y    ்     ா      [க]ள்
SFX y    0     ளா      [்][கு]ள்
SFX y    ்     ா     [கபமரலவழ]்
SFX y    ு     ா   [^ன]
SFX y    0    வா    [ன]
SFX y    0    யா    ை
SFX y    ்     ே     [தா]ய்
SFX y    0    ணே     ண்
SFX y    ்     ே      [^பொமு]ன்
SFX y    0    னே      [பொமு]ன்
SFX y    ்     ே      [க]ள்
SFX y    0     ளே      [்][கு]ள்
SFX y    ்     ே     [கபமரலவழ]்
SFX y    ு     ே   [^ன]
SFX y    0    வே    [ன]
SFX y    0    யே     ை
SFX y    ்     ோ     [தா]ய்
SFX y    0    ணோ     ண்
SFX y    ்     ோ      [^பொமு]ன்
SFX y    0    னோ      [பொமு]ன்
SFX y    ்     ோ      [க]ள்
SFX y    0     ளோ      [்][கு]ள்
SFX y    ்     ோ     [கபமரலவழ]்
SFX y    ு     ோ   [^ன]
SFX y    0    வோ    [ன]
SFX y    0    யோ     ை
SFX y    0     தான்      ்
SFX y    0     தான்     ன
SFX y    0     தான்     [^த்]து
SFX y    0     த்தான்     [க்]கு
SFX y    0     த்தான்     [ைகசடணதபமயரலவழளற]
SFX y    0     தானா      ்
SFX y    0     தானா     ன
SFX y    0     தானா     [^த்]து
SFX y    0     த்தானா     [க்]கு
SFX y    0     த்தானா     [ைகசடணதபமயரலவழளற]
SFX y    0     தானே      ்
SFX y    0     தானே     ன
SFX y    0     தானே     [^த்]து
SFX y    0     த்தானே     [க்]கு
SFX y    0     த்தானே     [ைகசடணதபமயரலவழளற]
SFX y    0     தானோ      ்
SFX y    0     தானோ     ன
SFX y    0     தானோ     [^த்]து
SFX y    0     த்தானோ     [க்]கு
SFX y    0     த்தானோ     [ைகசடணதபமயரலவழளற]
